Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-512.04
Perpetual care
trust fund; audit; exception; filing;
expense.

On June 30 of each year, the individual
trustees or corporate trustee, as the case may be, of a perpetual
care trust fund shall have an audit of the perpetual care trust fund made
by a certified public accountant except
as otherwise provided in section 12-531. The report of such audit by the auditor
shall be filed within thirty days after June 30 of such year with the county
clerk of the county in which the cemetery is located. The expense of the audit
and the filing fee of the report shall be paid by the cemetery association.

Laws 1953, c. 20, § 4, p. 90;

Laws 2014, LB863, § 7.